lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.aff
FLAG num
SFX 4212 Y 1
SFX 4212 a elia's a
SFX 272 Y 1
SFX 272 l tion l
SFX 1156 Y 1
SFX 1156 e ization's e
SFX 4504 Y 1
SFX 4504 r ther's r
SFX 3082 Y 1
SFX 3082 n tion n
SFX 2165 Y 1
SFX 2165 l na l
SFX 3065 Y 1
SFX 3065 d tte d
SFX 2414 Y 1
SFX 2414 m na m
SFX 4966 Y 1
SFX 4966 e llers e
SFX 3596 Y 1
SFX 3596 t ves's t
SFX 988 Y 1
SFX 988 r tion r
SFX 4926 Y 1
SFX 4926 l mes l
SFX 3717 Y 1
SFX 3717 p ssiest p
SFX 1281 Y 1
SFX 1281 l tor's l
SFX 3741 Y 1
SFX 3741 e shly e
SFX 3652 Y 1
SFX 3652 l tory l
SFX 3339 Y 1
SFX 3339 e ka e
SFX 885 Y 1
SFX 885 d ss d
SFX 70 Y 1
SFX 70 e or e
SFX 4137 Y 1
SFX 4137 a ha's a
SFX 2174 Y 1
SFX 2174 g llowing g
SFX 2524 Y 1
SFX 2524 a ese a
SFX 4095 Y 1
SFX 4095 e idnesses e
SFX 3654 Y 1
SFX 3654 r tor's r
SFX 2141 Y 1
SFX 2141 e ousnesses e
SFX 1254 Y 1
SFX 1254 a da's a
SFX 4518 Y 1
SFX 4518 a ter a
SFX 3412 Y 1
SFX 3412 e ha's e
SFX 2629 Y 1
SFX 2629 r tte r
SFX 3134 Y 1
SFX 3134 l ss l
SFX 3672 Y 1
SFX 3672 e tic e
SFX 2672 Y 1
SFX 2672 n ss n
SFX 2417 Y 1
SFX 2417 g mped g
SFX 175 Y 1
SFX 175 e ively e
SFX 3379 Y 1
SFX 3379 a ies a
SFX 4138 Y 1
SFX 4138 a ha a
SFX 1290 Y 1
SFX 1290 p ss p
SFX 2512 Y 1
SFX 2512 d ff's d
SFX 731 Y 1
SFX 731 r ss r
SFX 4162 Y 1
SFX 4162 e ff's e
SFX 163 Y 1
SFX 163 e ies e
SFX 2883 Y 1
SFX 2883 e ha e
SFX 1542 Y 1
SFX 1542 m phy's m
SFX 4450 Y 1
SFX 4450 e tt e
SFX 3656 Y 1
SFX 3656 e ton's e
SFX 3098 Y 1
SFX 3098 l ter l
SFX 729 Y 1
SFX 729 m tic m
SFX 3681 Y 1
SFX 3681 m ter m
SFX 4517 Y 1
SFX 4517 p ter p
SFX 3087 Y 1
SFX 3087 s tic s
SFX 4821 Y 1
SFX 4821 e oidal e
SFX 1374 Y 1
SFX 1374 s ter s
SFX 544 Y 1
SFX 544 e ized e
SFX 4446 Y 1
SFX 4446 r tty's r
SFX 4161 Y 1
SFX 4161 d ffle d
SFX 3081 Y 1
SFX 3081 e tion's e
SFX 3623 Y 1
SFX 3623 t unding t
SFX 2838 Y 1
SFX 2838 e itionally e
SFX 288 Y 1
SFX 288 l tion's l
SFX 3080 Y 1
SFX 3080 n tion's n
SFX 2203 Y 1
SFX 2203 e ifier e
SFX 4667 Y 1
SFX 4667 p rmer's p
SFX 1118 Y 1
SFX 1118 r tion's r
SFX 4376 Y 1
SFX 4376 p ve's p
SFX 3838 Y 1
SFX 3838 m per m
SFX 2806 Y 1
SFX 2806 d lls d
SFX 2293 Y 1
SFX 2293 t uter t
SFX 3541 Y 1
SFX 3541 a ba a
SFX 2903 Y 1
SFX 2903 d ffed d
SFX 2805 Y 1
SFX 2805 e lls e
SFX 841 Y 1
SFX 841 d nces d
SFX 3445 Y 1
SFX 3445 e ffed e
SFX 1336 Y 1
SFX 1336 a er's a
SFX 741 Y 1
SFX 741 g lls g
SFX 577 Y 1
SFX 577 e ish e
SFX 4961 Y 1
SFX 4961 h lls h
SFX 3467 Y 1
SFX 3467 c er's c
SFX 2363 Y 1
SFX 2363 d re d
SFX 2161 Y 1
SFX 2161 d nd d
SFX 1358 Y 1
SFX 1358 t ve's t
SFX 1990 Y 1
SFX 1990 d er's d
SFX 1873 Y 1
SFX 1873 e re e
SFX 366 Y 1
SFX 366 c zing c
SFX 518 Y 1
SFX 518 d nt d
SFX 3994 Y 1
SFX 3994 e line e
SFX 3894 Y 1
SFX 3894 e nt e
SFX 3927 Y 1
SFX 3927 g nd g
SFX 1835 Y 1
SFX 1835 t ugh t
SFX 4719 Y 1
SFX 4719 i re i
SFX 2408 Y 1
SFX 2408 l nces l
SFX 3928 Y 1
SFX 3928 m nces m
SFX 411 Y 1
SFX 411 e inesses e
SFX 3595 Y 1
SFX 3595 f ving f
SFX 2789 Y 1
SFX 2789 l nd l
SFX 4010 Y 1
SFX 4010 a ler a
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 m nd m
SFX 946 Y 1
SFX 946 l nt l
SFX 2397 Y 1
SFX 2397 m nt m
SFX 1680 Y 1
SFX 1680 n re n
SFX 3790 Y 1
SFX 3790 n ro's n
SFX 891 Y 1
SFX 891 p re p
SFX 3326 Y 1
SFX 3326 e ler e
SFX 2185 Y 1
SFX 2185 g ker's g
SFX 4986 Y 1
SFX 4986 g ler g
SFX 2709 Y 1
SFX 2709 p rking p
SFX 4656 Y 1
SFX 4656 n ron n
SFX 130 Y 1
SFX 130 e ity e
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 i ler i
SFX 2602 Y 1
SFX 2602 p ving p
SFX 983 Y 1
SFX 983 s zing s
SFX 4050 Y 1
SFX 4050 g ity g
SFX 1084 Y 1
SFX 1084 a in's a
SFX 3826 Y 1
SFX 3826 n pt's n
SFX 633 Y 1
SFX 633 t ving t
SFX 2660 Y 1
SFX 2660 p tches p
SFX 4078 Y 1
SFX 4078 d in's d
SFX 2922 Y 1
SFX 2922 a elle's a
SFX 2586 Y 1
SFX 2586 y zing y
SFX 1061 Y 1
SFX 1061 e ously e
SFX 1171 Y 1
SFX 1171 a en's a
SFX 96 Y 1
SFX 96 e ings e
SFX 1161 Y 1
SFX 1161 e in's e
SFX 2851 Y 1
SFX 2851 g in's g
SFX 2173 Y 1
SFX 2173 g llows g
SFX 1436 Y 1
SFX 1436 a le a
SFX 3466 Y 1
SFX 3466 d ered d
SFX 427 Y 1
SFX 427 c sms c
SFX 4017 Y 1
SFX 4017 d le d
SFX 844 Y 1
SFX 844 e le e
SFX 93 Y 1
SFX 93 e ingly e
SFX 1225 Y 1
SFX 1225 g le g
SFX 1604 Y 1
SFX 1604 a ene's a
SFX 4913 Y 1
SFX 4913 e mon's e
SFX 4646 Y 1
SFX 4646 n rth's n
SFX 3329 Y 1
SFX 3329 h le h
SFX 3172 Y 1
SFX 3172 n rk's n
SFX 1577 Y 1
SFX 1577 i le i
SFX 4035 Y 1
SFX 4035 d ke's d
SFX 2111 Y 1
SFX 2111 p rk's p
SFX 601 Y 1
SFX 601 c zation c
SFX 2896 Y 1
SFX 2896 d ge's d
SFX 1153 Y 1
SFX 1153 g ke's g
SFX 2218 Y 1
SFX 2218 e ge's e
SFX 3969 Y 1
SFX 3969 e lted e
SFX 1782 Y 1
SFX 1782 a ed a
SFX 623 Y 1
SFX 623 a ie a
SFX 2519 Y 1
SFX 2519 a et a
SFX 3301 Y 1
SFX 3301 g lted g
SFX 1611 Y 1
SFX 1611 c ed c
SFX 618 Y 1
SFX 618 e ism's e
SFX 4725 Y 1
SFX 4725 n ral n
SFX 2000 Y 1
SFX 2000 a ella's a
SFX 911 Y 1
SFX 911 d ed d
SFX 4677 Y 1
SFX 4677 n rita's n
SFX 2906 Y 1
SFX 2906 d et d
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 e ie e
SFX 877 Y 1
SFX 877 l tive l
SFX 4075 Y 1
SFX 4075 e ined e
SFX 2230 Y 1
SFX 2230 d ering d
SFX 2200 Y 1
SFX 2200 g ined g
SFX 3665 Y 1
SFX 3665 r tive r
SFX 1890 Y 1
SFX 1890 e ories e
SFX 1995 Y 1
SFX 1995 a ena's a
SFX 1904 Y 1
SFX 1904 a ng a
