lib/vendor/dicts/en_EN.dic
Brigid/1,30,33,3065
Chan/1,16,21,111,120,151,189,193,208,214,225,292,307,337,385,404,460,483,776,1051,1059,1128,1173,1613,1785,1786,2010,2331,2692,3169,3790,4253,4656,4677,4678,4681
Dora/1,531,1013,1339,1597,1604,1995,2000,2515,2536,2922,4212
Gina/1,2922
Hogan/1,4646
Krysta/1,107,556,557,1436,2443
Lane/1,3339,4037
Leta/1,1195,2030,4137
Liss/1,18,30,31,33,53,61,75,106,1374,2082,2639,2653
Madura/75,106,2524
Nada/1,595,1336,1453,2536
Otha/1,900,2000,4212
Purim/1,2,2412,2414
Romona/1254
Sada/1,26,63,623,688,1779,2000
Sela/1,595,688,1083,1453,1604,1995,2825,3963
Shanna/40,1022,1171
Shea/1,15,1995,1996,3541,4284
Shel/1,5,30,33,49,107,133,146,158,262,294,339,346,497,510,532,536,651,751,1025,1149,1150,1167,1614,1657,1789,2026,2030,2085,2165,2413,2549
Ural/1,2,233,2165
Vita/1,4518
Zita/1,2000
Zorn/1,3790
airman/2672
alibi/1,2,3,4,1577
amid/2,8,16,21,84,188,885,1210,3918,4444,4882
boep/891,4690
bond/1,2,3,4,9,12,14,29,69,78,90,167,185,195,340,341,378,428,438,439,508,911,963,1096,1163,1471,1600,1773,1990
budge/2,6,7,26,48,57,63,82,97,119,127,163,347,398,3691
clog/1,2,131,135,2415,2416,2417,3268,3286
collective/382,491,544,545,560,591,592,618,744,1014,1075,1156,1233
common/2,5,9,10,11,12,14,17,38,76,434,565,697,1881,2733,3078,3080,3082,4331
contemn/2,3,4,2730,3826
crud/1,2,8,9,16,38,45,58,64,178,216,307,513,646,788,820,1251,1393,1489,1668,1860,2220,2906,3151,3317,3745,3982,4170
dace/1,2,3412
discrete/5,10,11,17,22,23,24,544,903,2195
dispose/15,19,2838,2839
dorm/1,2,9,12,14,226,348,747,1626,1806,2259,3838
drop/1,2,109,113,207,250,251,327,332,380,388,410,498,521,529,600,659,893,894,934,1038,1290,1385,1510,2094,3000,4332,4591
eliminate/2,5,6,7,22,23,24,54,70,77,81
equivocal/5,10,11,17,272,275,288,309,325,351,387,1190,1191,1281
eulogise/2,6,7,13,15,19,3672
excrete/2,6,7,13,15,22,23,24,286,1890
feta/1,2,49,1095,1782
final/2,5,8,16,21,45,58,59,64,67,73,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,1558,1707,2408,4897,4899
flora/1,2,49,160,381,1084,1086,2519,2845,3350,4063,4175
future/1,2,130,154,161,618,744,1701,2145,3255,3256,3257
game/1,2,5,6,7,10,11,13,15,17,19,84,96,122,132,144,147,259,310,336,357,408,411,438,451,459,516,619,854,1074,1085,1161,1228,1236,1316,1792,1943,2013,2014,2096,2097,2677,4913,4915
gesticulate/2,6,7,23,24,54,175
glad/2,5,8,10,11,16,17,21,178,216,218,232,270,307,536,606,650,841,842,1340,1616,2161,2244,2245,2363,2405,3813,4888
grad/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,29,89,102,104,142,190,241,266,513,518,803,885,927,1002,1198,1288,2151,2161,2220,2303,2304,2405,2620,2621,2622,3062,3063,3432,3640,3641,3923,4078,4079,4082,4092,4149,4150,4151,4430
gray/2,3,4,5,9,10,17,38,115,2276,2279,2586,2589,3574
hear/3,6,9,12,14,29,32,38,209,280,293,303,528,805,1046,2450,3597,3764,4369,4377,4504,4506
heat/1,2,9,12,14,29,35,169,471,515,584,633,656,718,838,1358,1637,2057,2666,3121,3122,3596,3605,4358,4363
hole/1,7,18,35,132,144,163,336,411,459,955,2171,2189,3326
image/1,2,6,7,103,128,141,619,1236,4072,4075
individual/1,2,5,45,47,58,59,64,65,67,73,79,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,244,257,265,271,272,274,275,288,291,295,309,325,351,387,1077,4039
integral/1,2,5,272,275,288,309,325,351,387,877,1190,1191,1281,2784,2789,4895
kappa/1,2,623,3379
knit/2,48,57,82,119,127,487,503,658,1515,2287,3596
local/2,3,4,5,8,16,21,45,58,64,79,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,244,257,265,271,272,274,275,288,295,309,325,351,387,877,1190,1191,1281,2644,3074,3079,3098
mammogram/2,1542,2376
miniature/6,7,305,335,382,491,492,544,545,560,574,591,592,903,1014,1075,1156,1233
mite/1,2,1873,2120,2657,3193,4682,4717
modular/2,5,45,58,64,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,705,771,805,988,1046,1117,1118,3070,3653,3654
moral/1,2,5,8,16,21,45,46,52,58,59,64,67,73,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,121,126,134,244,257,265,271,274,291,1077,3133,3134,4565
moue/1,2,6,7,3656,3657
narcotic/1,2,366,377,393,396,429,440,601,654
normal/2,5,45,58,64,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,244,257,265,271,274,877,972,1255,1320,1580,1583,1841,2019,2452
nude/2,5,10,11,13,84,130,154,161,305,335,382,468,618,744,1977,2217,2218,2894,2895,3425,3430
official/1,2,5,10,47,65,79,272,275,288,309,325,351,387,791,946,1099,1190,1191,1250,1281,1553,1897
overemphasis/1,3,4,8,16,983,1039,1040,1271,2277,2278
oversee/2,3,13,15,19,27,1433,2805
pacific/25,222,242,256,302,358,427,2338
pantheism/1,2,729
pore/2,6,7,13,19,93,1061,1135,1215,2141
praise/1,2,6,7,13,19,93,2050,2594,3019,3020,4350
procreate/2,6,7,54,70,286,2453
puke/2,6,7,3339
pulsar/1,2,771,805,1046,1117,1118
pure/4,5,6,7,8,10,11,13,16,17,21,84,130,154,161,305,335,382,468,578,618,619,744,854,1236,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1588,1977,2002,2189,2203,2217,2477,2812,2894,2895,3328,3377,3425,3430,4616,4627,4628,4682,4717
quid/1,2,841,1007,1334,1556,1910
rasp/1,2,3,4,9,12,18,29,34,36,51,1800,2027,2550,4517
realizable/1,2,10,11,163
regular/1,2,5,45,58,64,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,705,771,805,988,1046,1117,1118,3070,3653,3654,3665
reintroduce/2,6,7,2643,3081
ridicule/1,2,6,7,13,15,736,1061,1135,1215,2141
satin/1,2,3,4,18,208,249,448,728,1680,2362,2720
servile/2,5,10,11,130,154,161
shelf/1,2,3,4,108,252,432,1187,3567,3595,3602,3610,4331
ship/1,2,41,42,44,69,78,90,109,112,113,207,250,251,284,330,374,893,894,922,953,1043,1065,1110,1222,1309,1432,1691,1864,2434,2592,2593,2703,2704,2709,2710,3032,3534,4264,4349,4368
signal/1,2,3,4,5,9,14,46,52,69,78,80,85,86,87,90,91,92,95,98,112,121,126,134,139,143,168,212,3652
slat/1,2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,32,48,57,401,486,503,515,584,596,633,655,656,718,1358,1636,1821,1969,1970,4365,4513,4514
sleep/1,2,3,9,12,14,18,32,34,36,50,56,72,74,129,164,172,196,246,612,809,1515,1823,2054,2055,2056,2287,2602,3029,3035,3591,4361,4376
slot/1,2,48,57,1637,1835,2057,2301,3059,3060,3605,3638
snip/2,3,4,8,9,12,14,16,21,109,113,207,250,251,466,609,610,1885,1886,2135,2139,2660,2661,3106,3689
sorcerer/1,2,731,883
spic/1,3,4,8,16,18,21,34,36,56,72,74,129,136,1611,1775,2066,2067,2068,2329,3467
squirm/2,3,4,18,34,36,3681,4484,4516,4528
sting/2,3,9,12,14,18,34,36,51,56,72,74,129,1152,1934,2185,2832,3196,4722
stone/1,2,6,7,13,15,50,132,144,300,336,350,356,411,459,547,873,874,1044,2595,2596,2601,3028
swag/1,2,3,69,131,135,276,402,1455,1736,2173,2174,2175,2176,2505,2506,2851
swig/1,2,131,135,686,741,843,901,3917
symmetric/136,366,377,393,396,429,440,601,727
syphilis/1,8,983,1040,3087
take/1,2,7,13,15,19,27,96,192,258,332,388,612,632,738,809,998,1001,1032,1037,1263,1552,2581
thieve/2,6,7,96,103,128,141,577,1445,1446
tram/1,2,231,237,287,313,379,430,2942,3281,3523,3928,4852,4854,4896,4898
trapeze/1,2,6,7,383,1935,2146,2186,2455,2761,4821
triad/1,2,43,2896,3428
trig/2,131,135,846,1152,1153,1229,2122,4724
unsee/3,27,51,71,216,3894,4916
unspecific/1611
venal/5,45,58,64,272,288,309
vile/5,10,11,13,17,84,844,1323,1463,1464,1465,1467,1579,1588,1929,1952,2203,2477
vocal/2,5,43,47,59,65,67,73,80,85,86,87,91,92,95,98,126,134,139,143,166,244,254,257,265,271,272,274,288,295,309,877,1582,1841,2644,3074,3079
wild/2,3,4,5,9,10,11,17,32,38,911,1333,1600,1766,1768,2223,2545,2899,2941,3461,3520,4187,4188,4978
